Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201177-5024.01
Notice;
contents.

The commission shall give notice of
the time and place of the first meeting held pursuant to sections 77-5022 to 77-5028 by publication
in a newspaper of general circulation in the State of Nebraska. Such notice
shall contain a statement that the agenda shall be readily available for public
inspection at the principal office of the commission during normal business
hours. The agenda shall be continually revised to remain current. The commission
may thereafter modify the agenda and need only provide notice of the meeting
to the affected counties in the manner provided in section 77-5026. The commission shall
publish in its notice a list of those counties certified under section 77-5027
as having assessments which may fail to satisfy the requirements of law. The notice shall also contain a statement
advising that any petition brought by a county board of equalization pursuant
to section 77-1504.01 to adjust the value of a class or subclass of real property
will be heard between July 26 and August 10 at a date, time, and place as
provided in the agenda maintained by the commission.

Laws 2003, LB 291, § 11;

Laws 2005, LB 261, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB384, § 34.
August 27, 2011